Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Penalties

246.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS

246.210

, subsection (2) of KRS

246.220

, or subsection (1) of KRS

246.420

shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) for the first offense; he shall be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and be confined in the county jail for not less than sixty (60) days nor more than one hundred and twenty (120) days, for each subsequent offense.

Any person who violates subsection (3) of KRS

246.220

shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100) or be imprisoned for not more than ten (10) days, or both. Each day’s hindering or refusal of access shall constitute a separate offense.

Any person who violates subsection (4) of KRS

246.220

shall be fined not less than two dollars ($2) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any person who violates subsection (5) of KRS

246.220

shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates subsection (6) of KRS

246.220

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than fifty dollars ($50).

Any person who violates subsection (7) of KRS

246.220

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisoned for not more than three (3) months, or both.

Any owner or operator of a dairy plant who shall fail to comply with the provisions of KRS

246.240

or any part thereof shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who purchases ginseng knowing that the ginseng was taken, acquired, possessed, sold, transported, or purchased in violation of administrative regulations authorized under KRS

246.660

shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

The Commissioner or any peace officer may seize and take possession of any ginseng taken, acquired, possessed, sold, transported, or purchased by a person committing a violation of administrative regulations authorized under KRS

246.660

. Any ginseng seized in accordance with this paragraph shall be impounded by the arresting officer and shall be taken before the court trying the person arrested.

Upon conviction, the court trying the case shall have the discretion of determining whether any of the ginseng seized under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall be declared contraband. Any ginseng seized under paragraph (b) of this subsection is subject to being declared contraband. If any ginseng is declared contraband, the court shall enter an order accordingly. A copy of the order shall be forwarded to the Commissioner, and the ginseng shall be placed in the custody of the arresting officer, to be delivered to the Commissioner.

The Commissioner may sell, at the highest market price obtainable, with the approval of the Governor and Finance and Administration Cabinet, all contraband ginseng which comes into his or her possession under the order of any court. All proceeds arising from the sale of contraband ginseng shall be paid into the Kentucky ginseng fund established in KRS

246.655

. A record of the sale, including the name of the purchaser and the price paid, shall be kept by the Commissioner.

Any person who violates subsection (2) of KRS

246.420

shall be disqualified from exhibiting at an exhibition for a first offense, and shall be disqualified for up to five (5) years for a second or subsequent offense.

History.

42c-7, 42g-3, 63c-5, 63d-11, 68n-11, 1376b-24, 1719a-11, 4814c-18: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 7, § 4; 1970, ch. 96, § 11; 1982, ch. 310, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 261, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2002, ch. 88, § 11, effective March 28, 2002; 2004, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2011, ch. 15, § 4, effective June 8, 2011.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The state veterinarian and his representatives have the authority and power to proceed to inspect and test cattle, wherever found, for contagious or communicable disease and any person who refuses to permit such inspection or testing will be subject to prosecution under KRS 246.990(2), 257.990(1) or 257.990(10).

OAG 60-973

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.